Tennessee, session 114, SB0916.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-12-203(10), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
(RRR) Animal fighting under § 39-14-203.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0916
001937
- 1 -